src/fst/morphology/clitics.lexc
! TODO: add flag diacritics so the same clitic cannot be repeated. likewise for pronoun clitic cases

LEXICON PA
!+Pa:%>pa # ;
+Pa:%>^P^A # ; ! TODO: connect the lexicon. First = test in twolc that it works.

LEXICON K_1 ! U flag diacritics so the same case clitic cannot occur twice (then D flags in K_2)
 person_number_case_1 ;
@U.CLT.FOC@+Clt/Foc:@U.CLT.FOC@%>nga 	K_2 ;	! (NB different to +Der/Foc "nguninji")
! modifiers
@U.CLT.KIRLI@+Clt/Prob:@U.CLT.KIRLI@%>kirli	K_2 ;
@U.CLT.LKA@+Clt/contrary_to_expectation:@U.CLT.LKA@%>lka	K_2 ;
@U.CLT.YILTA@+Clt/really:@U.CLT.YILTA@%>yilta	K_2 ;
@U.CLT.CERT@+Clt/Cert:@U.CLT.CERT@%>ngulyu	K_2 ;
@U.CLT.REP@+Clt/Rep:@U.CLT.REP@%>nyu		K_2 ;
@U.CLT.DUB@+Clt/Dub:@U.CLT.DUB@%>pa		K_2 ;	! dubitative, NB same symbol as epenthetic pa
@U.CLT.EMPH@+Clt/Emph:@U.CLT.EMPH@%>kaja	K_2 ;
@U.CLT.EMPH@+Clt/Emph:@U.CLT.EMPH@%>rtuka	K_2 ;
@U.CLT.EMPH@+Clt/Emph:@U.CLT.EMPH@%>rtu		K_2 ;
! connective clitics
@U.CLT.KAJI@+Clt/while:@U.CLT.KAJI@%>kaji 	K_2 ;
@U.CLT.LA@+Clt/when:@U.CLT.LA@%>la 		K_2 ;
@U.CLT.LTA@+Clt/then:@U.CLT.LTA@%>lta		K_2 ;
@U.CLT.YILA@+Clt/then:@U.CLT.YILA@%>yila	K_2 ; 

LEXICON K_2
 person_number_case_1 ;
@D.CLT.FOC@+Clt/Foc:@D.CLT.FOC@%>nga 		person_number_case_1 ;
! modifiers
@D.CLT.KIRLI@+Clt/Prob:@D.CLT.KIRLI@%>kirli	person_number_case_1 ;
@D.CLT.LKA@+Clt/contrary_to_expectation:@D.CLT.LKA@%>lka	person_number_case_1 ;
@D.CLT.YILTA@+Clt/really:@D.CLT.YILTA@%>yilta	person_number_case_1 ;
@D.CLT.CERT@+Clt/Cert:@D.CLT.CERT@%>ngulyu	person_number_case_1 ;
@D.CLT.REP@+Clt/Rep:@D.CLT.REP@%>nyu		person_number_case_1 ;
@D.CLT.DUB@+Clt/Dub:@D.CLT.DUB@%>pa		person_number_case_1 ;
@D.CLT.EMPH@+Clt/Emph:@D.CLT.EMPH@%>kaja	person_number_case_1 ;
@D.CLT.EMPH@+Clt/Emph:@D.CLT.EMPH@%>rtuka	person_number_case_1 ;
@D.CLT.EMPH@+Clt/Emph:@D.CLT.EMPH@%>rtu		person_number_case_1 ;
! connective clitics
@D.CLT.KAJI@+Clt/while:@D.CLT.KAJI@%>kaji 	person_number_case_1 ;
@D.CLT.LA@+Clt/when:@D.CLT.LA@%>la 		person_number_case_1 ;
@D.CLT.LTA@+Clt/then:@D.CLT.LTA@%>lta		person_number_case_1 ;
@D.CLT.YILA@+Clt/then:@D.CLT.YILA@%>yila	person_number_case_1 ;

!! Pronoun clitics (quite long)
LEXICON person_number_case_1 ! U flag diacritics so the same case cannot appear twice -> D flag
! diacritics on lexicon person_number_case_2
 vocative ;
! Subject case 
@U.CLCASE.S@+Pron/Clt+1Sg+Subj:@U.CLCASE.S@%>rna 		person_number_case_2 ;
@U.CLCASE.S@+Pron/Clt+2Sg+Subj:@U.CLCASE.S@%>n 			person_number_case_2 ;
@U.CLCASE.S@+Pron/Clt+3Sg+Subj:@U.CLCASE.S@%> 			person_number_case_2 ;
@U.CLCASE.S@+Pron/Clt+1Du+Incl+Subj:@U.CLCASE.S@%>li 		person_number_case_2 ;
@U.CLCASE.S@+Pron/Clt+1Du+Excl+Subj:@U.CLCASE.S@%>liju 		person_number_case_2 ;
@U.CLCASE.S@+Pron/Clt+2Du+Subj:@U.CLCASE.S@%>npula 		person_number_case_2 ;
@U.CLCASE.S@+Pron/Clt+3Du+Subj:@U.CLCASE.S@%>pula 		person_number_case_2 ;
@U.CLCASE.S@+Pron/Clt+1Pl+Incl+Subj:@U.CLCASE.S@%>la 		person_number_case_2 ;
@U.CLCASE.S@+Pron/Clt+1Pl+Excl+Subj:@U.CLCASE.S@%>laju 		person_number_case_2 ;
@U.CLCASE.S@+Pron/Clt+2Pl+Subj:@U.CLCASE.S@%>nyurra 		person_number_case_2 ;
@U.CLCASE.S@+Pron/Clt+3Pl+Subj:@U.CLCASE.S@%>ya 		person_number_case_2 ;

! Absolutive case (object of transitive verbs)
@U.CLCASE.ABS@+Pron/Clt+1Sg+Abs:@U.CLCASE.ABS@%>rni 		person_number_case_2 ;
@U.CLCASE.ABS@+Pron/Clt+2Sg+Abs:@U.CLCASE.ABS@%>nta 		person_number_case_2 ;
@U.CLCASE.ABS@+Pron/Clt+3Sg+Abs:@U.CLCASE.ABS@%> 		person_number_case_2 ;
@U.CLCASE.ABS@+Pron/Clt+1Du+Incl+Abs:@U.CLCASE.ABS@%>linya 	person_number_case_2 ;
@U.CLCASE.ABS@+Pron/Clt+1Du+Excl+Abs:@U.CLCASE.ABS@%>linyaju 	person_number_case_2 ;
@U.CLCASE.ABS@+Pron/Clt+2Du+Abs:@U.CLCASE.ABS@%>ntapula 	person_number_case_2 ;
@U.CLCASE.ABS@+Pron/Clt+3Du+Abs:@U.CLCASE.ABS@%>pulanya 	person_number_case_2 ;
@U.CLCASE.ABS@+Pron/Clt+1Pl+Incl+Abs:@U.CLCASE.ABS@%>lanya 	person_number_case_2 ;
@U.CLCASE.ABS@+Pron/Clt+1Pl+Excl+Abs:@U.CLCASE.ABS@%>lanyaju 	person_number_case_2 ;
@U.CLCASE.ABS@+Pron/Clt+2Pl+Abs:@U.CLCASE.ABS@%>nyurranya 	person_number_case_2 ;
@U.CLCASE.ABS@+Pron/Clt+3Pl+Abs:@U.CLCASE.ABS@%>jananya 	person_number_case_2 ;
 
! Dative case 
@U.CLCASE.DAT@+Pron/Clt+1Sg+Dat:@U.CLCASE.DAT@%>ju 		person_number_case_2 ;
@U.CLCASE.DAT@+Pron/Clt+2Sg+Dat:@U.CLCASE.DAT@%>ngku	 	person_number_case_2 ;
@U.CLCASE.DAT@+Pron/Clt+3Sg+Dat:@U.CLCASE.DAT@%>ra 		person_number_case_2 ;
@U.CLCASE.DAT@+Pron/Clt+1Du+Incl+Dat:@U.CLCASE.DAT@%>limpa 	person_number_case_2 ;
@U.CLCASE.DAT@+Pron/Clt+1Du+Excl+Dat:@U.CLCASE.DAT@%>limpaju	person_number_case_2 ;
@U.CLCASE.DAT@+Pron/Clt+2Du+Dat:@U.CLCASE.DAT@%>ngkupula 	person_number_case_2 ;
@U.CLCASE.DAT@+Pron/Clt+3Du+Dat:@U.CLCASE.DAT@%>pulampa 	person_number_case_2 ;
@U.CLCASE.DAT@+Pron/Clt+1Pl+Incl+Dat:@U.CLCASE.DAT@%>lampa 	person_number_case_2 ;
@U.CLCASE.DAT@+Pron/Clt+1Pl+Excl+Dat:@U.CLCASE.DAT@%>lampaju 	person_number_case_2 ;
@U.CLCASE.DAT@+Pron/Clt+2Pl+Dat:@U.CLCASE.DAT@%>nyurrampa 	person_number_case_2 ;
@U.CLCASE.DAT@+Pron/Clt+3Pl+Dat:@U.CLCASE.DAT@%>janampa 	person_number_case_2 ;

! Accessory case - accessory can be Locative or Allative
@U.CLCASE.ACS@+Pron/Clt+1Sg+Acs:@U.CLCASE.ACS@%>rni 		person_number_case_2 ;
@U.CLCASE.ACS@+Pron/Clt+2Sg+Acs:@U.CLCASE.ACS@%>nta 		person_number_case_2 ;
@U.CLCASE.ACS@+Pron/Clt+3Sg+Acs:@U.CLCASE.ACS@%>lu 		person_number_case_2 ;
@U.CLCASE.ACS@+Pron/Clt+1Du+Incl+Acs:@U.CLCASE.ACS@%>linya 	person_number_case_2 ;
@U.CLCASE.ACS@+Pron/Clt+1Du+Excl+Acs:@U.CLCASE.ACS@%>linyaju	person_number_case_2 ;
@U.CLCASE.ACS@+Pron/Clt+2Du+Acs:@U.CLCASE.ACS@%>ntapula 	person_number_case_2 ;
@U.CLCASE.ACS@+Pron/Clt+3Du+Acs:@U.CLCASE.ACS@%>pulanya 	person_number_case_2 ;
@U.CLCASE.ACS@+Pron/Clt+1Pl+Acs:@U.CLCASE.ACS@%>lanya 		person_number_case_2 ;
@U.CLCASE.ACS@+Pron/Clt+1Pl+Excl+Acs:@U.CLCASE.ACS@%>lanyaju 	person_number_case_2 ;
@U.CLCASE.ACS@+Pron/Clt+2Pl+Acs:@U.CLCASE.ACS@%>nyurranya 	person_number_case_2 ;
@U.CLCASE.ACS@+Pron/Clt+3Pl+Acs:@U.CLCASE.ACS@%>jananya 	person_number_case_2 ;
 
! Ablative case
@U.CLCASE.ABL@+Pron/Clt+1Sg+Abl:@U.CLCASE.ABL@%>jura 		person_number_case_2 ;
@U.CLCASE.ABL@+Pron/Clt+2Sg+Abl:@U.CLCASE.ABL@%>ngkura 		person_number_case_2 ;
@U.CLCASE.ABL@+Pron/Clt+3Sg+Abl:@U.CLCASE.ABL@%>lura 		person_number_case_2 ;
@U.CLCASE.ABL@+Pron/Clt+1Du+Incl+Abl:@U.CLCASE.ABL@%>limpajura 	person_number_case_2 ;
@U.CLCASE.ABL@+Pron/Clt+2Du+Excl+Abl:@U.CLCASE.ABL@%>ngkurapula person_number_case_2 ;
@U.CLCASE.ABL@+Pron/Clt+3Du+Abl:@U.CLCASE.ABL@%>janampalura 	person_number_case_2 ;
@U.CLCASE.ABL@+Pron/Clt+1Pl+Abl:@U.CLCASE.ABL@%>lampajura 	person_number_case_2 ;
@U.CLCASE.ABL@+Pron/Clt+2Pl+Abl:@U.CLCASE.ABL@%>ngkurapula 	person_number_case_2 ;
@U.CLCASE.ABL@+Pron/Clt+3Pl+Abl:@U.CLCASE.ABL@%>janampalura 	person_number_case_2 ;
 
! Reflexive pronoun clitics
@U.CLCASE.REFL@+Pron/Clt+Refl:%>@U.CLCASE.REFL@ju 		person_number_case_2 ;
@U.CLCASE.REFL@+Pron/Clt+Refl:%>@U.CLCASE.REFL@ngku 		person_number_case_2 ;


LEXICON person_number_case_2
 vocative ;
! Subject case 
@D.CLCASE.S@+Pron/Clt+1Sg+Subj:@D.CLCASE.S@%>rna 		vocative ;
@D.CLCASE.S@+Pron/Clt+2Sg+Subj:@D.CLCASE.S@%>n 			vocative ;
@D.CLCASE.S@+Pron/Clt+3Sg+Subj:@D.CLCASE.S@%>ø 			vocative ;
@D.CLCASE.S@+Pron/Clt+1Du+Incl+Subj:@D.CLCASE.S@%>li 		vocative ;
@D.CLCASE.S@+Pron/Clt+1Du+Excl+Subj:@D.CLCASE.S@%>liju 		vocative ;
@D.CLCASE.S@+Pron/Clt+2Du+Subj:@D.CLCASE.S@%>npula 		vocative ;
@D.CLCASE.S@+Pron/Clt+3Du+Subj:@D.CLCASE.S@%>pula 		vocative ;
@D.CLCASE.S@+Pron/Clt+1Pl+Incl+Subj:@D.CLCASE.S@%>la 		vocative ;
@D.CLCASE.S@+Pron/Clt+1Pl+Excl+Subj:@D.CLCASE.S@%>laju 		vocative ;
@D.CLCASE.S@+Pron/Clt+2Pl+Subj:@D.CLCASE.S@%>nyurra 		vocative ;
@D.CLCASE.S@+Pron/Clt+3Pl+Subj:@D.CLCASE.S@%>ya 		vocative ;

! Absolutive case (object of transitive verbs)
@D.CLCASE.ABS@+Pron/Clt+1Sg+Abs:@D.CLCASE.ABS@%>rni 		vocative ;
@D.CLCASE.ABS@+Pron/Clt+2Sg+Abs:@D.CLCASE.ABS@%>nta 		vocative ;
@D.CLCASE.ABS@+Pron/Clt+3Sg+Abs:@D.CLCASE.ABS@%> 		vocative ;
@D.CLCASE.ABS@+Pron/Clt+1Du+Incl+Abs:@D.CLCASE.ABS@%>linya 	vocative ;
@D.CLCASE.ABS@+Pron/Clt+1Du+Excl+Abs:@D.CLCASE.ABS@%>linyaju 	vocative ;
@D.CLCASE.ABS@+Pron/Clt+2Du+Abs:@D.CLCASE.ABS@%>ntapula 	vocative ;
@D.CLCASE.ABS@+Pron/Clt+3Du+Abs:@D.CLCASE.ABS@%>pulanya 	vocative ;
@D.CLCASE.ABS@+Pron/Clt+1Pl+Incl+Abs:@D.CLCASE.ABS@%>lanya 	vocative ;
@D.CLCASE.ABS@+Pron/Clt+1Pl+Excl+Abs:@D.CLCASE.ABS@%>lanyaju	vocative ;
@D.CLCASE.ABS@+Pron/Clt+2Pl+Abs:@D.CLCASE.ABS@%>nyurranya 	vocative ;
@D.CLCASE.ABS@+Pron/Clt+3Pl+Abs:@D.CLCASE.ABS@%>jananya	 	vocative ;
 
! Dative case 
@D.CLCASE.DAT@+Pron/Clt+1Sg+Dat:@D.CLCASE.DAT@%>ju 		vocative ;
@D.CLCASE.DAT@+Pron/Clt+2Sg+Dat:@D.CLCASE.DAT@%>ngku 		vocative ;
@D.CLCASE.DAT@+Pron/Clt+3Sg+Dat:@D.CLCASE.DAT@%>ra 		vocative ;
@D.CLCASE.DAT@+Pron/Clt+1Du+Incl+Dat:@D.CLCASE.DAT@%>limpa 	vocative ;
@D.CLCASE.DAT@+Pron/Clt+1Du+Excl+Dat:@D.CLCASE.DAT@%>limpaju	vocative ;
@D.CLCASE.DAT@+Pron/Clt+2Du+Dat:@D.CLCASE.DAT@%>ngkupula 	vocative ;
@D.CLCASE.DAT@+Pron/Clt+3Du+Dat:@D.CLCASE.DAT@%>pulampa 	vocative ;
@D.CLCASE.DAT@+Pron/Clt+1Pl+Incl+Dat:@D.CLCASE.DAT@%>lampa 	vocative ;
@D.CLCASE.DAT@+Pron/Clt+1Pl+Excl+Dat:@D.CLCASE.DAT@%>lampaju 	vocative ;
@D.CLCASE.DAT@+Pron/Clt+2Pl+Dat:@D.CLCASE.DAT@%>nyurrampa 	vocative ;
@D.CLCASE.DAT@+Pron/Clt+3Pl+Dat:@D.CLCASE.DAT@%>janampa 	vocative ;

! Accessory case - accessory can be Locative or Allative
@D.CLCASE.ACS@+Pron/Clt+1Sg+Acs:@D.CLCASE.ACS@%>rni 		vocative ;
@D.CLCASE.ACS@+Pron/Clt+2Sg+Acs:@D.CLCASE.ACS@%>nta 		vocative ;
@D.CLCASE.ACS@+Pron/Clt+3Sg+Acs:@D.CLCASE.ACS@%>lu 		vocative ;
@D.CLCASE.ACS@+Pron/Clt+1Du+Incl+Acs:@D.CLCASE.ACS@%>linya 	vocative ;
@D.CLCASE.ACS@+Pron/Clt+1Du+Excl+Acs:@D.CLCASE.ACS@%>linyaju 	vocative ;
@D.CLCASE.ACS@+Pron/Clt+2Du+Acs:@D.CLCASE.ACS@%>ntapula 	vocative ;
@D.CLCASE.ACS@+Pron/Clt+3Du+Acs:@D.CLCASE.ACS@%>pulanya 	vocative ;
@D.CLCASE.ACS@+Pron/Clt+1Pl+Acs:@D.CLCASE.ACS@%>lanya 		vocative ;
@D.CLCASE.ACS@+Pron/Clt+1Pl+Excl+Acs:@D.CLCASE.ACS@%>lanyaju	vocative ;
@D.CLCASE.ACS@+Pron/Clt+2Pl+Acs:@D.CLCASE.ACS@%>nyurranya 	vocative ;
@D.CLCASE.ACS@+Pron/Clt+3Pl+Acs:@D.CLCASE.ACS@%>jananya 	vocative ;
 
! Ablative case
@D.CLCASE.ABL@+Pron/Clt+1Sg+Abl:@D.CLCASE.ABL@%>jura 		vocative ;
@D.CLCASE.ABL@+Pron/Clt+2Sg+Abl:@D.CLCASE.ABL@%>ngkura 		vocative ;
@D.CLCASE.ABL@+Pron/Clt+3Sg+Abl:@D.CLCASE.ABL@%>lura 		vocative ;
@D.CLCASE.ABL@+Pron/Clt+1Du+Incl+Abl:@D.CLCASE.ABL@%>limpajura 	vocative ;
@D.CLCASE.ABL@+Pron/Clt+2Du+Excl+Abl:@D.CLCASE.ABL@%>ngkurapula vocative ;
@D.CLCASE.ABL@+Pron/Clt+3Du+Abl:@D.CLCASE.ABL@%>janampalura 	vocative ;
@D.CLCASE.ABL@+Pron/Clt+1Pl+Abl:@D.CLCASE.ABL@%>lampajura 	vocative ;
@D.CLCASE.ABL@+Pron/Clt+2Pl+Abl:@D.CLCASE.ABL@%>ngkurapula 	vocative ;
@D.CLCASE.ABL@+Pron/Clt+3Pl+Abl:@D.CLCASE.ABL@%>janampalura 	vocative ;
 
! Reflexive pronoun clitics
@D.CLCASE.REFL@+Pron/Clt+Refl:%>@D.CLCASE.REFL@ju 		vocative ;
@D.CLCASE.REFL@+Pron/Clt+Refl:%>@D.CLCASE.REFL@ngku 		vocative ;

LEXICON vocative ! (TODO: move to another file)
 # ;
+Voc:%>wu # ;
